Idaho, session 2025, H0197.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 17, Title 42, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 42-1781, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
42-1781. DIVERSION OF WATER TO SUPPORT AQUIFER RECHARGE. The Idaho wa-
ter resource board shall divert, pursuant to its recharge water rights, all
available water for recharge purposes in the eastern Snake plain aquifer un-
til:
(1) The eastern Snake plain aquifer recharge goal of three hundred
fifty thousand (350,000) acre-feet is met for that irrigation season or a
higher goal is set by an approved state water plan and met; or
(2) The director of the department of water resources declares, in
writing, that the aquifer or any part of the aquifer that was subject to
recharge is stable.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.